Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4
HEALTH CARE COVERAGE COOPERATIVE
RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY

25.5-1-401. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part repealed, p. 1011, § 23, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This part 4 was added in 1994. For amendments to this part 4 prior to its repeal in 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.